Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Persons Subject to Tax; Returns and Payment; Credits.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Liability of nonresident fur company under this act.
See 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 22.

Taxability of oil lease bonus.
See 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 27.

Medical deductions for part-year residents under Alaska Net Income Tax Act.
See 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

The Annette Islands Reserve must be treated as a true reservation at least for purposes of state taxation; thus, individual Metlakatlans who earn income on the reservation are exempt from state income tax except that those Metlakatlans who earn income both within and without the reservation are taxable on that portion of their income earned off the reservation. 1978 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

Income of a nonresident from intangible personal property (e.g. dividends from stocks and bonds) was not subject to income tax unless the intangible property that was the source of the income had a business situs in Alaska.
1980 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 33.

Sec. 43.20.010.
Tax on individuals, fiduciaries, and corporations. [Repealed, § 13 ch 70 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 43.20.011.
Tax on corporations.

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

There is imposed for each taxable year upon the entire taxable income of every corporation derived from sources within the state a tax computed as follows:

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

If the taxable income is: Then the tax is: Less than $25,000 zero $25,000 but less than $49,000 2 percent of the taxable income over $25,000 $49,000 but less than $74,000 $480 plus 3 percent of the taxable income over $49,000 $74,000 but less than $99,000 $1,230 plus 4 percent of the taxable income over $74,000 $99,000 but less than $124,000 $2,230 plus 5 percent of the taxable income over $99,000 $124,000 but less than $148,000 $3,480 plus 6 percent of the taxable income over $124,000 $148,000 but less than $173,000 $4,920 plus 7 percent of the taxable income over $148,000 $173,000 but less than $198,000 $6,670 plus 8 percent of the taxable income over $173,000 $198,000 but less than $222,000 $8,670 plus 9 percent of the taxable income over $198,000 $222,000 or more $10,830 plus 9.4 percent of the taxable income over $222,000.

Click to view

History.

(§ 1 ch 70 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 110 SLA 1978; am § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980; am § 9 ch 2 SSSLA 1980; am §§ 8-11 ch 113 SLA 1980; am §§ 2-4 ch 116 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 9, ch. 2, SSSLA 1980 also repealed (a)-(d) and (f) of this section, which had been repealed by ch. 1, SSSLA 1980. Section 10 of ch. 2, SSSLA 1980 had the effect of amending § 12, ch. 1, SSSLA 1980 by making the repeals retroactive to January 1, 1979.

Cross references. —

For findings and purpose in connection with the repeal of the income tax on individuals and fiduciaries, see § 1, ch. 1, SSSLA 1980, and § 1, ch. 2, SSSLA 1980, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For farm and agricultural land, see 3 AAC 138.

For corporate net income tax; administration and credits, see 15 AAC 20, art. 2.

For application of tax, see 15 AAC 21, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 3, ch. 21, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to (e) of this section apply to the taxable income of a corporation derived from sources within the state during a taxable year that begins on or after August 26, 2013.

Sec. 43.20.012.
Limitation on application of chapter; credits.

The tax imposed by this chapter does not

apply to an individual;

apply to a fiduciary;

for a tax year beginning after December 31, 2012, apply to an Alaska corporation that is a qualified small business and that meets the active business requirement in 26 U.S.C. 1202(e) as that subsection read on January 1, 2012; or

for a tax year beginning after June 30, 2007, apply to the income received by a regional association qualified under AS

16.10.380

or nonprofit corporation holding a hatchery permit under AS

16.10.400

from the sale of salmon or salmon eggs under AS

16.10.450

or from a cost recovery fishery under AS

16.10.455

.

An individual may file a return under this chapter in order to receive a tax credit under AS

43.20.013

.

For the purposes of (a)(3) of this section,

whether a corporation qualifies under (a)(3) of this section shall be determined on the first day of the tax year for which the corporation claims it qualifies under (a)(3) of this section;

all corporations that are members of the same parent-subsidiary controlled group shall be treated as one corporation.

In this section,

“Alaska corporation” means a corporation that has been incorporated in the state or is authorized to do business in the state;

“parent-subsidiary controlled group” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 1202 as that section read on January 1, 2012;

“qualified small business” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 1202 as that section read on January 1, 2012, and does not include a construction, transportation, utility, or fisheries business.

History.

(§ 2 ch 1 SSSLA 1980; am § 2 ch 2 SSSLA 1980; am §§ 6, 7 ch 51 SLA 2012; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 2013)

Delayed repeal of subsections (c) and (d). —

Under sec. 5, ch. 55, SLA 2013, (c) and (d) of this section are repealed July 1, 2023.

Delayed amendment of subsection (a). —

Under Sec. 2 and 10, ch. 55, SLA 2013, (a) of this section will be repealed and reenacted on July 1, 2023 to read: “(a) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply to

“(1) an individual;

“(2) a fiduciary; or

“(3) the income received by a regional association qualified under AS

16.10.380

or nonprofit corporation holding a hatchery permit under AS

16.10.400

from the sale of salmon or salmon eggs under AS

16.10.450

or from a cost recovery fishery under AS

16.10.455

.”

Cross references. —

For transitional provision relating to credit or refund of tax paid on income that is exempt under (a)(4) of this section, as enacted in sec. 1, ch. 55, SLA 2013, see sec. 7, ch. 55, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 43.20.013.
Individual tax credits.

A resident individual is entitled to a tax credit not to exceed $100 for

a contribution made in a calendar year to a person or organization for use exclusively

for a political campaign for a candidate for

President or Vice President of the United States, whether or not the candidate will be voted on in a primary election in Alaska;

United States senator from Alaska;

United States representative from Alaska;

governor or lieutenant governor of Alaska;

the Alaska legislature;

delegate to an Alaska constitutional convention;

electoral confirmation as a judge or justice of a court in Alaska; or

municipal office in Alaska; or

by a group seeking to influence the outcome of a ballot proposition or question in Alaska; and

dues paid in a calendar year to a nonprofit organization organized primarily for the purpose of influencing elections in Alaska.

A resident individual is entitled to a tax credit equal to 16 percent of the tax credit claimed by the individual on the federal income tax return of the individual for household and dependent care services necessary for gainful employment.

The commissioner shall pay the amount of a tax credit allowed by this section to a resident individual who makes a return as provided in AS

43.20.012

. A credit under this section shall be paid in the manner provided in AS

43.20.030(e)

for the payment of refunds and payment may not be made without an appropriation for that purpose.

History.

(§ 2 ch 1 SSSLA 1980; am § 9 ch 1 SSSLA 1980; am § 2 ch 2 SSSLA 1980)

Editor’s notes. —

The operation of AS

43.20.013

was suspended from August 28, 1987 until January 1, 1995 by § 1, ch. 27, SLA 1987, as amended by § 78, ch. 63, SLA 1993. Under § 85, ch. 63, SLA 1993, the 1993 amendment is retroactive to January 1, 1993.

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Sec. 43.20.014.
Income tax education credit.

A taxpayer is allowed a credit against the tax due under this chapter for contributions of cash or equipment accepted for

direct instruction, research, and educational support purposes, including library and museum acquisitions, and contributions to endowment, by an Alaska university foundation, by a nonprofit, public or private, Alaska two-year or four-year college accredited by a national or regional accreditation association, or by a public or private nonprofit elementary or secondary school in the state;

secondary school level vocational education courses, programs, and facilities by a school district in the state;

vocational education courses, programs, equipment, and facilities by a state-operated vocational technical education and training school, a nonprofit regional training center recognized by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, and an apprenticeship program in the state that is registered with the United States Department of Labor under 29 U.S.C. 50 — 50b (National Apprenticeship Act);

a facility by a nonprofit, public or private, Alaska two-year or four-year college accredited by a national or regional accreditation association or by a public or private nonprofit elementary or secondary school in the state;

Alaska Native cultural or heritage programs and educational support, including mentoring and tutoring, provided by a nonprofit agency for public school staff and for students who are in grades kindergarten through 12 in the state;

education, research, rehabilitation, and facilities by an institution that is located in the state and that qualifies as a coastal ecosystem learning center under the Coastal America Partnership established by the federal government;

the Alaska higher education investment fund under AS

37.14.750

;

funding a scholarship awarded by a nonprofit organization to a dual-credit student to defray the cost of a dual-credit course, including the cost of

tuition and textbooks;

registration, course, and programmatic student fees;

on-campus room and board at the postsecondary institution in the state that provides the dual-credit course;

transportation costs to and from a residential school approved by the Department of Education and Early Development under AS

14.16.200

or the postsecondary school in the state that provides the dual-credit course; and

other related educational and programmatic costs;

constructing, operating, or maintaining a residential housing facility by a residential school in the state approved by the Department of Education and Early Development under AS

14.16.200

;

childhood early learning and development programs and educational support to childhood early learning and development programs provided by a nonprofit corporation organized under AS 10.20, a tribal entity, or a school district in the state, by the Department of Education and Early Development, or through a state grant;

science, technology, engineering, and math programs provided by a nonprofit agency or a school district for school staff and for students in grades kindergarten through 12 in the state; and

the operation of a nonprofit organization dedicated to providing educational opportunities that promote the legacy of public service contributions to the state and perpetuate ongoing educational programs that foster public service leadership for future generations of residents of the state.

The amount of the credit is 50 percent of contributions.

Each public college and university shall include in its annual operating budget request contributions received and how the contributions were used.

A contribution claimed as a credit under this section may not

be the basis for a credit claimed under another provision of this title;

also be allowed as a deduction under 26 U.S.C. 170 against the tax imposed by this chapter; and

when combined with contributions that are the basis for credits taken during the taxpayer’s tax year under AS

21.96.070

, AS

43.55.019

, AS

43.56.018

, AS

43.65.018

, AS

43.75.018

, or AS

43.77.045

, result in the total amount of credits exceeding $1,000,000; if the taxpayer is a member of an affiliated group, then the total amount of credits may not exceed $1,000,000 for the affiliated group; in this paragraph, “affiliated group” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.145

.

The credit under this section may not reduce a person’s tax liability under this chapter to below zero for any tax year. An unused credit or portion of a credit not used under this section for a tax year may not be sold, traded, transferred, or applied in a subsequent tax year.

To qualify for a credit under this section, equipment must be appraised consistent with regulations adopted by the department to determine the value of the contribution for purposes of this section.

In this section,

“dual-credit student” means a secondary level student in the state who simultaneously earns college and high school credit for a course;

“nonprofit organization” means a charitable or educational organization in the state that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) (Internal Revenue Code);

“school district” means a borough school district, a city school district, a regional educational attendance area, or a state boarding school;

“vocational education” means organized educational activities that offer a sequence of courses that provides individuals with the academic and technical knowledge and skills the individuals need to prepare for further education and for careers other than careers requiring a baccalaureate, master’s, or doctoral degree.

History.

(§ 2 ch 58 SLA 1987; am § 45 ch 21 SLA 1991; am §§ 2, 3, 12 ch 71 SLA 1991; am § 4 ch 21 SLA 1994; am § 17 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 16 ch 81 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 86 SLA 2000; am § 7 ch 46 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 48 SLA 2008; am §§ 13, 15, 17, 19 ch 92 SLA 2010; am § 6 ch 7 FSSLA 2011; am § 7 ch 6 SLA 2012; am § 14 ch 74 SLA 2012; am §§ 36 — 38 ch 15 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2018; am §§ 6 — 10 ch 101 SLA 2018)

Delayed repeal of section in 2025. —

Under secs. 21 and 37, ch. 61, SLA 2014, as amended by § 40, ch. 101, SLA 2018, this section is repealed January 1, 2025.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, to harmonize the amendments made by chs. 21 and 71, SLA 1991, the words “by an Alaska” were inserted before “university foundation” in (a) of this section.

In 2010, in (d)(3) of this section “AS

21.96.070

,

21.96.075

” was substituted for “AS 21.89.070,

21.89.075

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 21.89.070 and

21.89.075

.

In 2012, in subsection (d), “ AS

43.20.145

” was substituted for “ AS

43.20.073

” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of
AS

43.20.073

.

In 2010 and 2018, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes; subsection (e) was enacted as (f) in 2010 and subsection (f) was enacted as (g) in 2018.
In 2014, the paragraphs in subsection (g) were reorganized to maintain alphabetical order; paragraphs (g)(1) and (2) were originally enacted as (3) and (4).

In 2018, “AS

21.96.075

,” was deleted from paragraph (d)(3) to harmonize the repeal of AS

21.96.075

by sec. 1, ch. 62, SLA 2018, effective January 1, 2019, with the changes made by ch. 101, SLA 2018.

Cross references. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 15, SLA 2014, see 2014 House Journal 1434 — 1437.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective January 1, 2009, rewrote the section.

The 2010 amendment, effective January 1, 2011, in (a)(2), added “, and facilities” following “programs”, and made related changes, in (a)(3), added “for vocational education courses, programs, and facilities pre- ceding “by a state-operated vocational”, and made a related change, added (4); in (b)(2), substituted “$200,000” for “$100,000”, added (a)(3), and made related changes; in (d)(1), substituted “be the basis for a credit claimed” for “be claimed as a credit”, in (d)(3), added “contributions that are the basis for” following “when combined with”, substituted “result in the total amount of credits exceeding $5,000,000; if the tax- payer is a member of an affiliated group, then the total amount of credits may not exceed $5,000,000 for the affiliated group; in this paragraph, “affiliated group” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.073

” for “exceed $150,000”; added (e).

The 2011 amendment, effective July 23, 2011, inserted “or an annual intercollegiate sports tournament” in (a)(4), added (a)(5) and (a)(6), and made a related change.

The first 2012 amendment, effective March 24, 2012, rewrote (f)(1) [now (g)(1)], which read, “ ‘school district’ has the meaning given in AS

14.03.126

.”

The second 2012 amendment, effective September 14, 2012, added (a)(7), and made stylistic changes.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (a), added “, or by a public or private nonprofit elementary or secondary school in the state;” at the end of (a)(1), rewrote (a)(3), which read, “vocational education courses, programs, and facilities by a state-operated vocational technical education and training school”, in (a)(4), deleted “or an annual intercollegiate sports tournament” following “a facility”, and added “or by a public or private nonprofit elementary or secondary school in the state” at the end; added (a) (8) — (12).

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “contributions of cash or equipment” for “cash contributions” in the introductory language, in (a)(1) and (4), inserted “national or” preceding “regional accreditation”; in (b)(2), substituted “75 percent” for “100 percent” at the beginning; in (d)(3), twice substituted “$1,000,000” for “$5,000,000”; added (g) [now (f)].

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, rewrote (b).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Contributions to a private nonprofit corporation that is raising money for a William A. Egan Instructional Program and Memorial at the University of Alaska are not eligible for the education tax credit, but contributions made directly to the University of Alaska for the memorial portion of the planned project would qualify for a credit if they were accepted for “library and museum acquisitions.” February 10, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 43.20.015.
Individual tax credit. [Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

Sec. 43.20.016.
Sharing of corporate income tax revenue with municipalities. [Repealed, § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985.]

Sec. 43.20.017.
Individual tax exemptions. [Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

Sec. 43.20.018.
Alaska veterans’ memorial endowment fund contribution credit. [Repealed, § 25 ch 46 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 43.20.020.
Exemptions. [Repealed, § 13 ch 70 SLA 1975.]

Sec. 43.20.021.
Internal Revenue Code adopted by reference.

Sections 26 U.S.C. 1 — 1399 and 6001 — 7872 (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, are adopted by reference as a part of this chapter. These portions of the Internal Revenue Code have full force and effect under this chapter unless excepted to or modified by other provisions of this chapter.

For purposes of calculating the federal tax payable on personal holding companies provided for in the provisions of 26 U.S.C. 541 (Internal Revenue Code), the rate is 12.6 percent.

For purposes of calculating the alternative tax on capital gains provided for in the provisions of 26 U.S.C. 1201 (Internal Revenue Code), the rate is 4.5 percent for corporations.

Where a credit allowed under the Internal Revenue Code is also allowed in computing Alaska income tax, it is limited to 18 percent for corporations of the amount of credit determined for federal income tax purposes which is attributable to Alaska. This limitation does not apply to a special industrial incentive tax credit under AS

43.20.042

.

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

For the purpose of calculating the alternative minimum tax on tax preferences provided for in 26 U.S.C. 55 — 59 (Internal Revenue Code), the tax is 18 percent for corporations of the applicable alternative minimum federal tax.

For purposes of calculating the accumulated earnings tax as provided in 26 U.S.C. 531 (Internal Revenue Code), the rate is 4.95 percent of the first $100,000 of accumulated taxable income and 6.93 percent of accumulated taxable income in excess of $100,000.

Nothing in this chapter or in AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact) may be construed as an exception to or modification of 26 U.S.C. 883.

The provision in (h) of this section does not apply to commercial passenger vessels as defined in AS

43.52.295

.

For purposes of calculating interest under the look-back method in 26 U.S.C. 460 (Internal Revenue Code), the rate of interest shall be as provided in that section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 70 SLA 1975; am §§ 1, 2 ch 125 SLA 1976; am §§ 3 — 5, 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980; am §§ 3 — 5, 9 ch 2 SSSLA 1980; am §§ 12, 13 ch 113 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 1984; am §§ 1, 2 ch 68 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 1998; am § 3, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2; am § 3 ch 55 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

In § 3, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2, the material set out in subsections (h) and (i) was enacted as subsections (b) and (c) and relettered in 2006, at which time, in (i), “(h) of this section” was substituted for “(b) of this section” and “AS

43.52.295

” was substituted for “AS 43.52.095” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of that section.

Section 3, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2, read “AS

43.20.021

is repealed and reenacted as follows:

Sec.

43.20.021(a)

. Internal Revenue Code adopted by reference.

(a) Sections 26 U.S.C.
— 1399 and 6001 — 7872 (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, are adopted by reference as a part of this chapter. These portions of the Internal Revenue Code have full force and effect under this chapter unless excepted to or modified by other provisions of this chapter. (b) Nothing in this chapter or in AS 43.19 (Multistate Tax Compact) may be construed as an exception to or modification of 26 U.S.C. 883. (c) The provision in (b) of this section does not apply to commercial passenger vessels as defined in AS 43.52.095.”.
If this section were interpreted as a repeal and reenactment of the entire section, it would have had the effect of eliminating the provisions of (b) — (d), (f), and (g) of this section, which involve matters that are outside the scope of the subject of the initiative that constituted the ballot measure.
In setting out the changes made by section 3 of the initiative, the changes made are, instead, shown as an amendment of (a) of this section and the addition of subsections (h) and (i).
Treatment of the material in this manner is consistent with the single subject of the initiative (commercial passenger vessels) and the descriptive title for the initiative as prepared and submitted by the initiative’s sponsors, as well as the actual introductory language of section 3 of the initiative, which set out the section number as “

Sec.

43.20.021(a)

” rather than “

Sec.

43.20.021

.”
The courts, however, are the final arbiters of the meaning of the initiative.

Administrative Code. —

For corporate net income tax; administration and credits, see 15 AAC 20, art. 2.

For corporate net income tax; combination and apportionment rules, see 15 AAC 20, art. 3.

For corporate net income tax; special rules for financial organizations and, see 15 AAC 20, art. 6.

For application of tax, see 15 AAC 21, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, 2006 Primary Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that made the 2006 amendment of (a) of this section and enacted (h) and (i) of this section, provides that “[I]t is the intention of the people of Alaska that any portion of this legislation that is declared unlawful shall be stricken in a manner that preserves the remaining portion of the remaining legislation to the maximum extent possible.”

Under sec. 8, ch. 55, SLA 2013, the addition of subsection (j) of this section is retroactive to January 1, 2013.

Sec. 43.20.030.
Returns and payment of taxes.

If a corporation, or a partnership that has a corporation as a partner, is required to make a return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, it shall file with the department, within 30 days after the federal return is required to be filed, a return setting out

the amount of tax due under this chapter, less credits claimed against the tax; and

other information for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter that the department requires.

The return shall either be on oath or contain a written declaration that it is made under penalty of perjury, and the department shall prescribe forms accordingly.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the total amount of tax imposed by this chapter is due and payable to the department at the same time and in the same manner as the tax payable to the United States Internal Revenue Service.

A taxpayer, upon request by the department, shall furnish to the department a true and correct copy of the tax return which the taxpayer has filed with the United States Internal Revenue Service. Every taxpayer shall notify the department in writing of any alteration in, or modification of, the taxpayer’s federal income tax return and of a recomputation of tax or determination of deficiency, whether with or without assessment. A full statement of the facts must accompany this notice. The notice shall be filed within 60 days after the final determination of the modification, recomputation or deficiency, and the taxpayer shall pay the additional tax or penalty under this chapter. For purposes of this section, a final determination shall mean the time that an amended federal return is filed or a notice of deficiency or an assessment is mailed to the taxpayer by the Internal Revenue Service, except that in no event will there be a final determination for purposes of this section until the taxpayer has exhausted rights of appeal under federal law.

The department may credit or refund overpayments of taxes, taxes erroneously or illegally assessed or collected, penalties collected without authority, and taxes that are found unjustly assessed or excessive in amount, or otherwise wrongfully collected. The department shall set limitations, specify the manner in which claims for credits or refunds are made, and give notice of allowance or disallowance. When a refund is allowed to a taxpayer, it shall be paid out of the general fund by a disbursement issued under a voucher approved by the department.

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

History.

(§ 7 ch 115 SLA 1949; am § 2 ch 132 SLA 1951; am § 4 ch 5 SLA 1953; am § 2 ch 169 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 70 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 22 SLA 1980; am §§ 6, 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980; am §§ 6, 9 ch 2 SSSLA 1980; am §§ 1, 2 ch 58 SLA 1988; am § 21 ch 175 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For corporate net income tax; administration and credits, see 15 AAC 20, art. 2.

For corporate net income tax; special rules for financial organizations and, see 15 AAC 20, art. 6.

Sec. 43.20.031.
Deduction of taxes; consolidated returns; accounting methods.

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

In computing the tax under this chapter, the taxpayer is not entitled to deduct any taxes based on or measured by net income. The taxpayer may deduct the tax levied and paid under AS 43.55.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 98 SLA 1984.]

An affiliated group of corporations may make or the commissioner may require them to make a consolidated return for the taxable year in place of separate returns. For purposes of calculating the amount of tax payable by the group under a consolidated filing, 26 U.S.C. 1501 — 1552 (Internal Revenue Code), as amended, apply.

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

A corporation which is a member of a group of unitary corporations which collectively has income from business activity taxable both inside and outside the state, or income from other sources both inside and outside the state, shall determine its income from sources in this state by use of the combined method of accounting.

History.

(§ 5 ch 70 SLA 1975; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 125 SLA 1976; am § 8 ch 73 SLA 1977; am § 6 ch 133 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1978; am § 235 ch 100 SLA 1980; am §§ 14 — 17 ch 113 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980; am § 9 ch 2 SSSLA 1980; am § 1 ch 98 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 2 TSSLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For corporate net income tax; administration and credits, see 15 AAC 20, art. 2.

For corporate net income tax; combination and apportionment rules, see 15 AAC 20, art. 3.

For corporate net income tax; special rules for oil and gas corporations, see 15 AAC 20, art. 4.

For corporate net income tax; special rules for financial organizations and, see 15 AAC 20, art. 6.

Secs. 43.20.033, 43.20.035
Taxable income of fiduciaries, nonresidents, and part-year residents. [Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

Sec. 43.20.036.
Federal tax deductions and credits.

For purposes of calculating the income tax payable under this chapter, the taxpayer may not apply as a credit against tax liability the foreign tax credit allowed as to federal taxes under 26 U.S.C. 27 (Internal Revenue Code).

For purposes of calculating the income tax payable under this chapter, the taxpayer may apply as a credit against tax liability the investment credit allowed as to federal taxes under 26 U.S.C. 38 (Internal Revenue Code) upon only the first $20,000,000 of qualified investment, other than qualified investment for a special industrial incentive investment tax credit under AS

43.20.042

, put into use in the state for each taxable year. This limitation does not apply to the amounts invested in equipment that meets the definition of a certified pollution control facility as defined in 26 U.S.C. 169 (Internal Revenue Code) as in effect on June 19, 1975, except that the date specified in 26 U.S.C. 169(d) (Internal Revenue Code) as a condition of qualifying a certified pollution control facility for a deduction does not apply.

For purposes of calculating the income tax payable under this chapter, the taxpayer may apply as an exemption from tax liability the tax exemption for domestic international sales corporations under 26 U.S.C. 991 (Internal Revenue Code), except those taxpayers who are engaged in the exportation of nonrenewable resources.

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

For purposes of calculating the tax payable under this chapter, a deduction under 26 U.S.C. 170 may only be taken if payment is made on or before the last day of the taxable year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 153 SLA 1975; § 1 ch 171 SLA 1975; am § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980; am § 9 ch 2 SSSLA 1980; am § 3 ch 22 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 117 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 60 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 58 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 68 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For corporate net income tax; administration and credits, see 15 AAC 20, art. 2.

Sec. 43.20.037.
Trade or business energy conservation credit. [Repealed, § 50 ch 83 SLA 1980.]

Secs. 43.20.038 — 43.20.039.
Residential fuel and residential fuel conservation credits. [Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

Sec. 43.20.040.
Income from sources in the state.

In this chapter, income from sources in the state includes

income from real or tangible personal property located in the state;

income of whatever nature from a business, trade or profession having a business situs in the state and compensation for services rendered in the state;

income from stocks, bonds, notes, bank deposits, and other intangible personal property having a taxable or business situs in the state;

rentals and royalties for the use of or for the privilege of using, in the state, patents, copyrights, secret processes and formulas, good will, marks, trade brands, franchises, and other property having a taxable or business situs in the state.

In this section, income is from a source having a taxable or business situs in the state if it is derived from

owning or operating business facilities or property in the state;

conducting business, farming, or fishing operations in the state;

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

a partnership which transacts business in the state;

a corporation which transacts business in the state which has elected to file federal returns under subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code;

[Repealed, § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980.]

engaging in any other activity from which income is received, realized or derived in the state.

The receipt of income derived solely from interest earned on property in the state does not alone establish a taxable or business situs in the state.

History.

(§ 5 B ch 115 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 132 SLA 1951; am § 2 ch 188 SLA 1955; am § 7 ch 70 SLA 1975; am § 10 ch 1 SSSLA 1980 and § 9 ch 2 SSSLA 1980; am § 2 ch 132 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose of the 1980 amendments, see § 1, ch. 1, SSSLA 1980, and § 1, ch. 2, SSSLA 1980, in the Temporary and Special Acts; for legislative intent relating to the 1996 amendments to this section made by ch. 132, SLA 1996, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For corporate net income tax; combination and apportionment rules, see 15 AAC 20, art. 3.

For corporate net income tax; special rules for oil and gas corporations, see 15 AAC 20, art. 4.

Sec. 43.20.042.
Special industrial incentive investment tax credits.

Subject to (c) of this section, for purposes of calculating eligible taxes the taxpayer may apply as a credit against eligible taxes the following percentage of the investment credit allowed as to federal taxes under 26 U.S.C. 38 (Internal Revenue Code) on only the first $250,000,000 of qualified investment in the state for each taxable year after December 31, 1984, for a gas processing project: (1) 100 percent on the first $50,000,000 of qualified investment; (2) 80 percent on qualified investment over $50,000,000 but not exceeding $100,000,000; (3) 70 percent on qualified investment over $100,000,000 but not exceeding $150,000,000; (4) 60 percent on qualified investment over $150,000,000 but not exceeding $200,000,000; and (5) 40 percent on qualified investment over $200,000,000 but not exceeding $250,000,000. A credit may not be allowed under this subsection for an investment credit that is allowed as to federal taxes for leased property by reason of 26 U.S.C. 168(f)(8) (Internal Revenue Code). In this subsection, “gas processing project” means the integrated plant, facilities, and equipment, including pollution control equipment, used for preparation of consumer or transportation gas, or for conditioning, fractionation, storage, handling or processing of a product, other than crude oil, of an oil or gas well, into liquefied natural gas, methanol, ammonia, urea, olefins, propanes, butanes, polymers and intermediate hydrocarbon products; it does not include a pipeline from oil and gas wells to or from a plant and facilities.

Subject to (c) of this section, for purposes of calculating eligible taxes the taxpayer may apply as a credit against eligible taxes the following percentage of the investment credit allowed as to federal taxes under 26 U.S.C. 38 (Internal Revenue Code) on only the first $250,000,000 of qualified investment in the state for each taxable year after December 31, 1984, for exploration, drilling of wells, development, or mining of the minerals and other natural deposits listed in 26 U.S.C. 613(b) (Internal Revenue Code) other than sand or gravel unless the mining of sand or gravel is ancillary to a mining development involving a qualified natural deposit other than sand or gravel: (1) 100 percent on the first $50,000,000 of qualified investment; (2) 80 percent on qualified investment over $50,000,000 but not exceeding $100,000,000; (3) 70 percent on qualified investment over $100,000,000 but not exceeding $150,000,000; (4) 60 percent on qualified investment over $150,000,000 but not exceeding $200,000,000; and (5) 40 percent on qualified investment over $200,000,000 but not exceeding $250,000,000. A credit may not be allowed under this subsection for any investment credit that is allowed as to federal taxes for leased property by reason of 26 U.S.C. 168(f)(8) (Internal Revenue Code). In this subsection, “mining” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 613(c)(2) (Internal Revenue Code).

A taxpayer may not claim an investment tax credit under (a) or (b) of this section unless the gas processing project or mining project began operation and production after December 31, 1984. A gas processing or mining project is considered to have begun operation and production when the first product or mineral is produced that is ultimately either sold or transferred for further processing or ultimate use.

A taxpayer may not claim an additional investment tax credit under AS

43.20.036(b)

for an investment for which a special industrial incentive investment tax credit is claimed under (a) or (b) of this section.

If a taxpayer making an investment that qualifies for the investment tax credit under this section is a member of a group of affiliated corporations filing a consolidated return under the provisions of this chapter, the amount of the investment tax credit that may be claimed on the consolidated return is limited to the amount the taxpayer making the qualified investment would have been eligible to claim had a consolidated return not been filed.

The investment tax credit per taxable year allowed by (a) and (b) of this section may not exceed 60 percent of the eligible tax liability. Any unused portion of the investment tax credit shall be subject to the carry forward provisions in 26 U.S.C. 46(b)(3) (Internal Revenue Code) except that the unused credit may not be carried forward to tax years beginning after December 31, 1999.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, a tax credit under this section may not be claimed on investments made after December 31, 1994.

In this section “eligible taxes” means the total tax liability of a taxpayer for the annual taxes due under the provisions of this chapter and AS 43.65.

History.

(§ 4 ch 60 SLA 1984)

Editor’s notes. —

26 U.S.C. 168(f)(8), referred to in subsections (a) and (b), no longer exists. Also, 26 U.S.C. 46(b)(3), referred to in subsection (f), no longer exists.

Sec. 43.20.043.
Gas exploration and development tax credit. [Repealed, §§ 2, 5, ch 61 SLA 2003, as amended by § 16 ch 15 SLA 2010.]